dict/builddict/names.dic
كونغولي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
مجر/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
فيتنام/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
أفغاني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
أنغولا/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
عمان/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
قبرص/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
يمن/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
سنغافورة/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
لاوس/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
بانكوك/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
بوغوتا/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
غابورون/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
هلسنكي/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
كييف/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
مسقط/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
باناما/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
سيوول/ADACABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
لقيا/ADACABAAMBMA
وسنى/ADACABAAMBMALBLA
حال/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
آدم/ABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
حبشة/ADACABAAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
بابا/ABAAEBEAMBMA
بشرى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAMBMALBLA
بلاغ/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
تيماء/ADACABAAMBMA
ثمراء/ADACABAAMBMA
ثورة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
جوفاء/ADACABAAMBMA
حديد/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
حسناء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
حصاة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJAMBMA
حمى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAMBMALBLA
خنفساء/ADACABAAGDGCGBGAMBMA
درماء/ADACABAAMBMA
دمشق/ABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
ذكرى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAMBMALBLA
رومان/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
زها/ADACABAAMBMA
أسقف/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
سلى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAJAMBMA
شزراء/ADACABAAMBMA
صحف/ADACABAAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
صعداء/ADACABAAMBMA
ضباب/ADACABAAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
ظلماء/ADACABAAMBMA
عروض/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
عصا/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAJAMBMA
مغرب/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
غضا/BDBCBBBAMBMA
فرعون/ADACABAACDCCCBCANDNCNBNALCLBLA
فيحاء/ADACABAAMBMA
قدر/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
كأداء/ADACABAAMBMA
لهاة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJAMBMA
مجوس/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
معرفة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
نعمى/ADACABAAMBMALBLA
منهج/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
هضلاء/ADACABAAMBMA
ورى/ADACABAAMBMA
باسك/ADACABAAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
تأسيس/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
اتساع/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
إذاعة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
أذى/ADACABAAJAMBMA
استثمار/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
اشتراك/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
انتحار/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
انحلال/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
تطلع/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
جد/ADACABAAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
حوار/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
دين/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
دوى/ADACABAAJAMBMA
زنى/ADACABAAJAMBMA
شعوب/ADACABAAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
تطبيق/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
تعقيم/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
غنى/ADACABAAJAMBMA
فضول/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
قياس/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
لحظ/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
نجاة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJAMBMA
نفع/ADACABAAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
هندسة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
طحلاء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
جوفاء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
ذقناء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
شلاء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
صماء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
عمشاء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
فطحاء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
لسناء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
نصباء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
وركاء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
يمناء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
سمراء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
يهماء/ADACABAAFDFCFBFAMBMA
ثري/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
تقدمي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
إنسي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
ائتلافي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
رأسمالي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
طبيعي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
مثالي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
وحدوي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
جنائي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
شرطي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
بيداغوجي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
خلي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
ملقي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
تمامة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
جعفري/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
أستيك/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
أبخاز/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLAJA
سويس/ADACABAANDNCNBNALCLBLA
بلوتون/ABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
إليزابيت/AAABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
خراسان/ABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
ستراسبورج/ABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
استانبول/ABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
تونج/AANDNCNBNALCLBLA
دومينيكان/AAABNDNCNBNALCLBLA
منفلوطي/AANDNCNBNALCLBLA
أنجلوسكسوني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
بهيمية/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
ثمانمائي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
لاإنساني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
أفريقي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
لينيني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
